Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0414.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3406ss. An insurer that delivers, issues for delivery, or renews in this state a health insurance policy shall provide coverage for group prenatal care services. As used in this section, "group prenatal care services" means a series of prenatal care visits provided in a group setting that are based on an evidence-based model that may include health assessments, social and clinical support, and educational activities in a family-centered environment and peer-to-peer interaction that helps pregnant individuals support one another during their pregnancy and into early childhood.